Wisconsin, session 2025, SB200.
do enact as follows:SB200,11Section 1. 108.14 (10m) of the statutes is created to read:SB200,2,42108.14 (10m) The department shall implement identity-proofing measures 3for claimants who are engaging in benefit-related transactions with the department 4that satisfy all of the following:SB200,2,75(a) The measures require a claimant to verify his or her identity prior to filing 6an initial claim for benefits and when engaging in other transactions with the 7department.SB200,2,98(b) The measures achieve the IAL2 and AAL2 standards adopted in the 9National Institute of Standards and Technology’s Digital Identity Guidelines.SB200,210Section 2. 108.14 (23m) of the statutes is created to read:SB200,2,1211108.14 (23m) The department shall provide training materials on the 12unemployment insurance system, including all of the following:SB200,2,1413(a) Training videos for claimants and employing units published on the 14department’s website.SB200,2,1615(b) Live training seminars for employing units that are free of charge and 16provided on a quarterly basis. The seminars may be in-person, online, or both.SB200,317Section 3. 108.14 (28) of the statutes is created to read:SB200,3,218108.14 (28) If the department suspends or reduces any method used by the 19department to detect fraud committed against the unemployment insurance 20program under this chapter, the department shall submit a notification detailing 21the suspension or reduction and the reasons therefor to the council on 1unemployment insurance, the governor, and the appropriate standing committees 2of the legislature under s. 13.172 (3).SB200,43Section 4. 108.14 (29) of the statutes is created to read:SB200,3,64108.14 (29) (a) The department shall maintain a call center to provide 5assistance and support by telephone to claimants for benefits under this chapter or 6payments under federal assistance programs for unemployment.SB200,3,87(b) 1. The department shall, during each of the following periods, operate the 8call center with hours of at least 9 a.m. to 5 p.m. on weekdays:SB200,3,109a. During a declared state of emergency for the state that causes or relates to 10an increase in unemployment claims.SB200,3,1311b. For 90 days after any week in which the call center experiences an increase 12of at least 100 percent in calls compared to the same week during the previous year, 13and for 90 days after each subsequent week in which such an increase occurs.SB200,3,15142. The department shall, during each of the following periods, operate the call 15center with hours after 5 p.m. on weekdays and at least 16 hours on weekends:SB200,3,1716a. During a declared state of emergency for the state that causes or relates to 17an increase in unemployment claims.SB200,3,2018b. For 90 days after any week in which the call center experiences an increase 19of at least 300 percent in calls compared to the same week during the previous year, 20and for 90 days after each subsequent week in which such an increase occurs.SB200,521Section 5. 108.14 (30) of the statutes is created to read:SB200,4,222108.14 (30) (a) The department shall, on at least a weekly basis, perform a 1comparison of recipients of benefits under this chapter against all of the following 2for the purpose of detecting fraud or erroneous payments:SB200,4,431. Nationally recognized databases that contain information on death records, 4including the federal social security administration’s death master file.SB200,4,552. The National Association of State Workforce Agencies’ integrity data hub.SB200,4,763. The national directory of new hires maintained by the office of child 7support enforcement in the U.S. department of health and human services.SB200,4,984. Prisoner databases maintained by the department of justice, the 9department of corrections, and the U.S. department of justice.SB200,4,11105. The U.S. Citizenship and Immigration Services Secure Automated 11Verification of Eligibility database.SB200,4,12126. Databases maintained by the U.S. Immigration and Customs Enforcement.SB200,4,1513(b) The department may perform comparisons of recipients of benefits under 14this chapter against public or private databases in addition to those specified in par. 15(a) 1. to 6.SB200,616Section 6. 939.74 (2) (d) of the statutes is created to read:SB200,5,217939.74 (2) (d) A prosecution for a felony violation under s. 108.24 (1) or (2) or 18under any other statute under which a person is prosecuted for fraud in obtaining 19unemployment insurance benefits, benefits under the pandemic unemployment 20assistance program under 15 USC 9021, benefits under the federal pandemic 21unemployment compensation and mixed earner unemployment compensation 22programs under 15 USC 9023, or benefits under the pandemic emergency 23unemployment compensation program under 15 USC 9025 must be commenced 1within 8 years after the commission of the violation if the violation is related to 2benefits that were paid or payable on or before September 4, 2021.SB200,73Section 7. Initial applicability. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb200 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb200 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB200 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB200 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB200: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting